Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB788.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 311.599 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a hearing or inquiry panel has probable cause to believe a physician is
suffering from a physical or mental condition that might impede his or her ability to
practice competently, the panel may order the physician to undergo a physical or
mental examination by persons designated by the panel.
(2) Failure of a physician to submit to such an examination when directed, unless the
failure was due to circumstances beyond his or her control, shall constitute an
admission that the concerned physician has developed such a physical or mental
disability, or other conditions, that continued practice is dangerous to patients or to
the public; said failure shall constitute a default and a final order may be entered
without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence.
(3) A physician whose license has been suspended, limited, restricted or revoked under
this section and KRS 311.595(8), shall at reasonable intervals be afforded an
opportunity to demonstrate that he or she can resume the competent practice of
medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:58 AM Jacketed